tools/join-sources/de-DE/join.lexc
! HFST join transducer for German (de-DE)
! Generated automatically from linguistic rules
! This transducer handles token joining for German

Multichar_Symbols
+Join
VOWEL
STEM
ADJ

LEXICON Root
JoinRules ;

LEXICON JoinRules
! Default: space join
%<PREV%>%<SPACE%>%<NEXT%> # ;

! negative prefix
un %<STEM%>:un+%<STEM%> # ;

! prefix attachment
vor %<STEM%>:vor+%<STEM%> # ;

! prefix attachment
nach %<STEM%>:nach+%<STEM%> # ;
